Maryland, session 2025, HB1257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–212.5.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1257*

HOUSE BILL 1257
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DWELLING UNIT” MEANS THAT PORTION OF A BUILDING THAT IS
DESIGNATED, INTENDED, OR ARRANGED FOR USE OR OCCUPANCY AS A RESIDENCE
BY ONE OR MORE PERSONS, INCLUDING A RENTED ROOM IN A SINGLE–FAMILY
HOUSE.
(3) “FEE” MEANS A CHARGE, A COST, OR A MONETARY OBLIGATION
OTHER THAN RENT.
(4) “MANDATORY FEE” MEANS A COMPULSORY FEE IMPOSED ON A
TENANT AS A CONDITION OF TENANCY.
(5) (I) “OPTIONAL FEE” MEANS A VOLUNTARY FEE THAT A TENANT
MAY ELECT TO PAY A LANDLORD FOR BENEFITS OR SERVICES RELATED TO THE
TENANCY.
(II) “OPTIONAL FEE” INCLUDES A FEE FOR PARKING, STORAGE,
OR PETS.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A:
(I) A LEASE SIGNED OR RENEWED ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1,
2025; AND
(II) A LANDLORD THAT OFFERS FIVE FOUR OR MORE DWELLING
UNITS FOR RENT.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) CHARGES IMPOSED ON A TENANT FOR THE PAYMENT OF
WATER, SEWER, GAS, GARBAGE COLLECTION, OR ELECTRIC UTILITIES;
(II) COSTS, FINES, OR FEES FOR MINOR VIOLATIONS OF A LEASE
AGREEMENT, OR OTHER IRREGULAR COSTS INCURRED AS A RESULT OF A TENANT’S
ACTIONS, SUCH AS A CHARGE FOR A REPLACEMENT KEY OR A PENALTY FOR A
VIOLATION OF THE BYLAWS OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY IF THE
DWELLING UNIT IS LOCATED IN A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; OR
(III) THE WITHHOLDING OF ANY PORTION OF A SECURITY
DEPOSIT AT THE END OF A TENANCY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–203 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1257 3
(C) (1) A LANDLORD MAY NOT ADVERTISE, PUBLISH, OR ANNOUNCE, OR
CAUSE TO BE ADVERTISED, PUBLISHED, OR ANNOUNCED, INCLUDING IN A LISTING
OR POSTING ON A WEBSITE THAT ADVERTISES AVAILABLE RESIDENTIAL RENTAL
PROPERTIES, THE RENTAL RATE OF A DWELLING UNIT UNLESS ALL MANDATORY
FEES ARE INCLUDED IN OR STATED WITH THE RENTAL RATE.
(2) IF A MANDATORY FEE IS DUE AT A TIME DIFFERENT FROM THE
RENT, THE LANDLORD SHALL SEPARATELY STATE THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE AND
THE TIME AT WHICH THE FEE WILL BE DUE.
(D) (C) (1) A LANDLORD SHALL, IN WRITING, PROVIDE A PROSPECTIVE
TENANT WITH AN ITEMIZED LIST THAT CLEARLY IDENTIFIES ALL FEES THAT A
LANDLORD MAY IMPOSE ON THE PROSPECTIVE TENANT AND INCLUDES THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) THE BASIS FOR THE FEE;
(II) THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE;
(III) WHETHER THE FEE IS A MANDATORY FEE OR AN OPTIONAL
FEE; AND
(IV) WHEN THE FEE IS DUE, INCLUDING WHETHER THE FEE IS
LUMP SUM, MONTHLY, OR PERIODIC IN SOME OTHER WAY.
(2) A LANDLORD MAY NOT IMPOSE A MANDATORY FEE ON A TENANT
THAT IS NOT DISCLOSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) A LEASE PROVISION FOR WHICH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBSECTION WERE NOT MET SHALL BE UNENFORCEABLE.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT SHALL ASSIST TENANTS AND PROSPECTIVE TENANTS WITH:
(I) UNDERSTANDING THIS SECTION; AND
(II) REPORTING VIOLATIONS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) AFTER AN OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING, THE DEPARTMENT OF
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT MAY IMPOSE AN ADMINISTRATIVE
PENALTY FOR EACH VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, NOT EXCEEDING:
(I) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, A WARNING;

HOUSE BILL 1257
(II) FOR A SECOND OFFENSE:
1. $500 IF THE LANDLORD IS AN INDIVIDUAL; OR
2. $1,000 IF THE LANDLORD IS AN ENTITY; AND
(III) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE:
1. $1,000 IF THE LANDLORD IS AN INDIVIDUAL; OR
2. $2,000 IF THE LANDLORD IS AN ENTITY.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) (1) A TENANT MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A LANDLORD FOR A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION THAT OCCURRED:
(I) ON OR AFTER FEBRUARY 1, 2026; AND
(II) DURING THE TENANCY OR UP TO 2 YEARS AFTER THE
TENANCY EXPIRED.
(2) IF A COURT DETERMINES A LANDLORD VIOLATED A PROVISION OF
THIS SECTION, THE COURT MAY AWARD DAMAGES EQUAL TO THREE TIMES THE
AMOUNT OF ACTUAL DAMAGES THAT RESULTED FROM THE VIOLATION AND
REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(F) (E) (1) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY ENACT LOCAL
LAWS CONSISTENT WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) ANY LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE THAT IS COMPARABLE IN
SUBJECT MATTER TO THIS SECTION SHALL SUPERSEDE THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SECTION TO THE EXTENT THAT THE LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE IS MORE STRINGENT
OR PROVIDES STRONGER PROTECTION TO A TENANT OR BROADER APPLICABILITY
THAN THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.